Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 2. Riparian Management.

Cross references. —

For legislative statement of findings and purpose relating to the 2006 amendment of several sections of this article, see § 1, ch. 65, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For riparian standards, see 11 AAC 95, art. 2.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 65, SLA 2006 (HB 420), amending several sections in this article to set riparian protection standards for forest resources and practices within Region II, Southcentral Alaska, see 2006 House Journal 2400 — 2402.

Sec. 41.17.115.
Management of riparian areas; regulations.

The commissioner shall protect riparian areas from the significant adverse effects of timber harvest activities on fish habitat and water quality. The management intent for riparian areas is the adequate preservation of fish habitat by maintaining a short- and long-term source of large woody debris, stream bank stability, channel morphology, water temperatures, stream flows, water quality, adequate nutrient cycling, food sources, clean spawning gravels, and sunlight.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations for the protection of riparian areas; the regulations may include higher standards of protection for fish and other public resources on land managed by the department than on other public land or private land. The regulations may vary by region of the state and must take into consideration reasonable classification of water bodies and the economic feasibility of timber operations.

History.

(§ 14 ch 34 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 107, § 26 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 § 26 (2008))

Revisor’s notes. —

Organized into subsections (a) and (b) in 1993 without textual change.

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

For riparian standards, see 11 AAC 95, art. 2.

For road construction, see 11 AAC 95, art. 3.

Sec. 41.17.116.
Riparian standards for private land.

Private forest land adjacent to the following types of water and located in Region I is subject to the riparian protection standards established in this subsection:

along a Type I-A water body,

operations within 100 feet of the water body or to the break of the slope, whichever area is smaller, shall be conducted in compliance with slope stability standards established in regulations adopted under this chapter; and

harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 66 feet of the water body;

along a Type I-B water body,

operations within 100 feet of the water body or to the break of the slope, whichever area is smaller, shall be conducted in compliance with slope stability standards established in regulations adopted under this chapter; and

harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 66 feet of the water body or to the break of the slope, whichever area is smaller;

along a Type I-C water body,

operations within 100 feet of the water body or to the break of the slope, whichever area is smaller, shall be conducted in compliance with slope stability standards established in regulations adopted under this chapter; and

where prudent, the operator shall retain low value timber within 25 feet of the water body or to the limit of the area described in (A) of this paragraph, whichever area is greater, where the width of the water body is

greater than 13 feet at the ordinary high water mark; or

greater than eight feet at the ordinary high water mark if the channel is incised;

along a Type I-D water body,

operations within 50 feet of the water body or to the break of the slope, whichever area is smaller, shall be conducted in compliance with slope stability standards established in regulations adopted under this chapter; and

where prudent, the operator shall retain low value timber within 25 feet of the water body or to the limit of the area described in (A) of this paragraph, whichever area is greater, where the width of the water body is

greater than 13 feet at the ordinary high water mark; or

greater than eight feet at the ordinary high water mark if the channel is incised.

Private forest land adjacent to the following types of water and located in Region II is subject to the riparian protection standards established in this subsection:

along a Type II-A water body, harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 150 feet of the water body; additionally, harvest of timber may not be undertaken along outer bends subject to erosion within 225 feet of the water body or to the terrace top break, whichever is smaller;

along a Type II-B water body, harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 150 feet of the water body; additionally, harvest of timber may not be undertaken along outer bends subject to erosion within 325 feet of the water body or to the terrace top break, whichever is smaller;

along a Type II-C water body, harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 100 feet of the water body;

along a Type II-D water body, there is a 100-foot riparian area; harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 50 feet of the water body;

the length of the augmented buffer along an outer bend subject to erosion in (1) or (2) of this subsection must be equal to a distance eight times the stream width measured on a reach between bends at a point not widened by a point bar or channel movement; the augmented buffer must be located so that three stream widths are upstream and five stream widths are downstream of the point opposite the apex of the point bar;

where an estuarine area is adjacent to an anadromous or high value resident fish water body, the riparian retention area for the adjacent water body applies to the estuarine area.

Private forest land adjacent to the following types of waters and located in Region III is subject to the riparian protection standards established in this subsection:

along a Type III-A water body, harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 66 feet of the water body;

along a Type III-B water body, harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 33 feet of the water body; between 33 and 66 feet from the water body, up to 50 percent of standing white spruce trees having at least a nine-inch diameter at breast height may be harvested without requiring a variation;

along a Type III-C water body, harvest of timber within 100 feet of the water body must be located and designed primarily to protect fish habitat and surface water quality as determined by the commissioner with due deference to the Department of Fish and Game.

In this section,

“low value timber” means timber that the owner or operator determines, at the time of harvest, to be uneconomic to harvest and market;

“prudent” means that the requirement can be met using reasonably available means or technology, that complying with the requirement is not likely to create significant impairment of the productivity of the land and water, and that the cost of achieving the requirement is not out of proportion to the benefits that can reasonably be expected to be achieved in the particular situation.

History.

(§ 14 ch 34 SLA 1990; am §§ 1, 2 ch 3 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 123 SLA 2003; am E.O. No. 107, § 27 (2003); am § 2 ch 65 SLA 2006; am E.O. No. 114 § 27 (2008))

Administrative Code. —

For riparian standards, see 11 AAC 95, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 31, ch. 34, SLA 1990 provides that until regulations are adopted by the commissioner under AS

41.17.116(b)

, “timber harvest operations on forest land within 100 feet from the shore or bank of an anadromous or high value resident fish water body must be sited and designed primarily to protect fish habitat and water quality.”

Sec. 41.17.118.
Riparian standards for state land.

The riparian standards for state land are as follows:

on state forest land managed by the department that is in Region I,

harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 100 feet immediately adjacent to an anadromous or high value resident fish water body;

between 100 and 300 feet from the water body, harvest of timber may occur but must be consistent with the maintenance of important fish and wildlife habitat as determined by the commissioner with due deference to the Department of Fish and Game;

on state forest land managed by the department that is in Region II,

along a Type II-A water body, harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 150 feet of the water body; additionally, harvest of timber may not be undertaken along outer bends subject to erosion within 225 feet of the water body or to the terrace top break, whichever is smaller;

along a Type II-B water body, harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 150 feet of the water body; additionally, harvest of timber may not be undertaken along outer bends subject to erosion within 325 feet of the water body or to the terrace top break, whichever is smaller;

along a Type II-C water body, harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 100 feet of the water body;

along a Type II-D water body, there is a 100-foot riparian area; harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 50 feet of the water body;

the length of the augmented buffer along an outer bend subject to erosion in (A) or (B) of this paragraph must be equal to a distance eight times the stream width measured on a reach between bends at a point not widened by a point bar or channel movement; the augmented buffer must be located so that three stream widths are upstream and five stream widths are downstream of the point opposite the apex of the point bar;

where an estuarine area is adjacent to an anadromous or high value resident fish water body, the riparian retention area for the adjacent water body applies to the estuarine area;

along Type II-A, II-B, II-C, and II-D water bodies, harvest of timber may occur between the landward extent of the riparian retention area and 300 feet from the water body, consistent with the maintenance or enhancement of important wildlife habitat as determined by the commissioner with due deference to the Department of Fish and Game;

on state forest land managed by the department that is in Region III,

along a Type III-A water body, harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 100 feet of the water body; however, between 66 feet and 100 feet from the water body, harvest of timber may be undertaken where consistent with the maintenance of important fish and wildlife habitat as determined by the commissioner with the concurrence of the Department of Fish and Game;

along a Type III-B water body, harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 50 feet of the water body; between 50 feet and 100 feet from the water body, up to 50 percent of standing white spruce trees having at least a nine-inch diameter at breast height may be harvested;

along a Type III-C water body, harvest of timber within 100 feet of the water body must be consistent with the maintenance of important fish and wildlife habitat as determined by the commissioner with due deference to the Department of Fish and Game.

The commissioner may impose additional riparian protection standards for timber harvest operations through the adoption of land use plans under AS

38.04.065

. Within a state forest established under AS

41.17.200

—

41.17.230

, riparian standards adopted by the commissioner under this subsection may not exceed the standards established under (a) of this section unless the commissioner makes a finding of compelling state interest.

In the absence of a site-specific determination by the Department of Fish and Game, the commissioner shall presume for planning purposes that a stream is anadromous if it is connected to anadromous waters that are without Department of Fish and Game documentation of a physical blockage and has a stream gradient of 8 percent or less.

History.

(§ 14 ch 34 SLA 1990; am § 9 ch 136 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 123 SLA 2003; am § 10 ch 153 SLA 2003; am E.O. No. 107, §§ 28, 29 (2003); am § 3 ch 65 SLA 2006; am E.O. No. 114 § 28 (2008))

Administrative Code. —

For riparian standards, see 11 AAC 95, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 32, ch. 34, SLA 1990 provides that this section “does not alter the terms of an existing contract or the outcome of litigation pending on May 12, 1990. An amendment to or renewal of an existing state timber contract must be consistent with AS 38.05 and AS 41.17.”

Sec. 41.17.119.
Minimum riparian standards for other public land.

The riparian standards for other public land are as follows:

in Region I, harvest of timber may not be undertaken within 100 feet of an anadromous or high value resident fish water body;

in Region II, the standards are the same as for state land under AS

41.17.118(a)(2)(A)

— (F) and regulations adopted under this chapter;

in Region III, the standards are the same as for state land under AS

41.17.118(a)(3)

and regulations adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 14 ch 34 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 123 SLA 2003; am E.O. No. 107, § 30 (2003); am § 4 ch 65 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For riparian standards, see 11 AAC 95, art. 2.